Utah statutes.
45-2-3.   Privileged publication or broadcast defined.
A privileged publication or broadcast which shall not be considered as
libelous or slanderous per se, is one made:
(1)  In the proper discharge of an official duty.
(2)  In any publication or broadcast of or any statement made in any
legislative or judicial proceeding, or in any other official proceeding
authorized by law.
(3)  In a communication, without malice, to a person interested therein, by
one who is also interested, or by one who stands in such relation to the
person interested as to afford a reasonable ground for supposing the motive
for the communication innocent, or who is requested by the person interested
to give the information.
(4)  By a fair and true report, without malice, of a judicial, legislative, or
other public official proceeding, or of anything said in the course thereof,
or of a charge or complaint made by any person to a public official, upon
which a warrant shall have been issued or an arrest made.
(5)  By a fair and true report, without malice, of the proceedings of a public
meeting, if such meeting was lawfully convened for a lawful purpose and open
to the public, or the publication or broadcast of the matter complained of was
for the public benefit.
